Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.350

Medical reports—Requirements.

(1) Every person, firm, society, association, corporation, or state agency receiving, securing a home for, or otherwise caring for a minor child shall transmit to the prospective adopting parent prior to placement and shall make available to all persons with whom a child has been placed by adoption a complete medical report containing all known and available information concerning the disabilities of the child.

(2) The report shall not reveal the identity of the birth parent of the child except as authorized under this chapter but shall include any known or available mental or physical health history of the birth parent that needs to be known by the adoptive parent to facilitate proper health care for the child or that will assist the adoptive parent in maximizing the developmental potential of the child.

(3) Where known or available, the information provided shall include:

(a) A review of the birth family's and the child's previous medical history, including the child's x-rays, examinations, hospitalizations, and immunizations. After July 1, 1992, medical histories shall be given on a standardized reporting form developed by the department;

(b) A physical exam of the child by a licensed physician with appropriate laboratory tests and x-rays;

(c) A referral to a specialist if indicated; and

(d) A written copy of the evaluation with recommendations to the adoptive family receiving the report.

(4) Entities and persons obligated to provide information under this section shall make reasonable efforts to locate records and information concerning the child's disabilities. The entities or persons providing the information have no duty, beyond providing the information, to explain or interpret the records or information regarding the child's present or future health.

[ 2020 c 274 s 4; 1994 c 170 s 1; 1991 c 136 s 4; 1990 c 146 s 6; 1989 c 281 s 1; 1984 c 155 s 37.]